Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-704 Security interest unperfected
before effective date. A security interest that is enforceable immediately
before this article takes effect but which would be subordinate to the rights
of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

(1) Remains an enforceable security interest for one
year after this article takes effect;

(2) Remains enforceable thereafter if the security
interest becomes enforceable under section 490:9-203 when this article takes
effect or within one year thereafter; and

(3) Becomes perfected:

(A) Without further action, when this article
takes effect if the applicable requirements for perfection under this article
are satisfied before or at that time; or

(B) When the applicable requirements for
perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time. [L
2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next